de: Typ der Rückseite des gestickten Aufnähers: Filzrückseite; Heißsiegel-/Aufbügelkleber; Klettverschluss (Haken); Klettverschluss (Schlaufe); Ohne Rückseite (roh); Papierrückseite (abreißbar); Selbstklebend; Nadel-Rückseite; Kunststoff-/PVC-Rückseite; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tipul de căptușeală a etichetei brodată: Suport din pâslă; Adeziv termosudabil/pentru aplicare cu fierul de călcat; Scai (partea cu cârlige); Scai (partea cu bucle); Fără suport (brut); Suport de hârtie (care se rupe); Adeziv autoadeziv (peel-and-stick); Prindere tip ac; Suport din plastic/PVC; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta podloge vezene zakrpe: Podloga od filca; Toplinsko brtvljenje / ljepljenje glačalom; Čičak (strana s kukicama); Čičak (strana s omčicama); Bez podloge (sirovo); Papirnata podloga (za trganje); Samoljepljiva podloga; Stražnja strana s iglom; Plastična / PVC podloga; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta vezene podloge: Podlaga iz filca; Lepilo za toplotno spajanje/likanje; Ježek (stran s kaveljčki); Ježek (stran z zankami); Brez podlage (surovo); Papirnata podlaga (odtrgljiva); Samolepljivo (odlepi in prilepi); Podlaga z zaponko; Plastična/PVC-podlaga; Drugo
nl: Geborduurde patch achterkant type: Vilten achterkant; Heatseal-/opstrijkbare kleeflaag; Klittenband (haakkant); Klittenband (luskant); Geen achterkant (ruw); Papieren achterkant (afscheurbaar); Zelfklevende achterkant; Speldsluiting; Plastic/PVC achterkant; Overige
vi: Loại lớp lót miếng vá thêu: Mặt sau bằng nỉ; Keo dán nhiệt/ủi; Khóa gai (mặt gai); Khóa gai (mặt xù); Không có mặt sau (thô); Mặt sau bằng giấy (xé được); Keo dán bóc dán; Mặt sau dạng ghim cài; Mặt sau bằng nhựa/PVC; Khác
fr: Type de support d'écusson brodé: Support en feutre; Adhésif thermocollant; Bande auto-agrippante (côté crochets); Bande auto-agrippante (côté boucles); Sans support (brut); Support en papier (déchirable); Adhésif à décoller et coller; Dos à épingle; Support en plastique/PVC; Autre
da: Type bagside på broderet mærke: Filtbagside; Varmeforsegling/strygelim; Burrebånd (krogside); Burrebånd (løkkeside); Ingen bagside (rå); Papirbagside (tear-away); Selvklæbende lim; Nålebagside; Plast-/PVC-bagside; Andet
cs: Způsoby aplikace vyšívané nášivky: Plstěný podklad; Nažehlovací vrstva; Suchý zip (háčková část); Suchý zip (smyčková část); Bez podkladu (hrubý); Papírový podklad (odtrhávací); Samolepicí vrstva; Zadní část se špendlíkem; Plastový / PVC podklad; Jiné
ru: Тип подложки вышитой нашивки: Основа из фетра; Термооснова/приклеивание утюгом; Застежка-липучка (сторона с крючками); Застежка-липучка (сторона с петлями); Без основы (необработанный); Бумажная основа (отрывная); Самоклеящаяся основа; Крепление на булавке; Пластиковая/ПВХ основа; Другое
en: Embroidered patch backing type: Felt backing; Heat-seal/iron-on adhesive; Hook-and-loop (hook side); Hook-and-loop (loop side); No backing (raw); Paper backing (tear-away); Peel-and-stick adhesive; Pin back; Plastic/PVC backing; Other
tr: Nakışlı yama arka kaplama türü: Keçe arka yüzey; Isıl yapışkan/ütüyle yapışan; Cırt cırtlı (kanca tarafı); Cırt cırtlı (halka tarafı); Arka yüzey yok (ham); Kağıt arka yüzey (yırtılabilen); Sıyır ve yapıştır yapışkanlı; İğneli arka yüzey; Plastik/PVC arka yüzey; Diğer
es: Tipo de parche bordado: Respaldo de fieltro; Termosellado/adhesivo para planchar; Cierre de gancho y bucle (lado del gancho); Cierre de gancho y bucle (lado del bucle); Sin respaldo (sin terminar); Respaldo de papel (desprendible); Adhesivo desprendible; Pin posterior; Respaldo de plástico/PVC; Otro
pl: Rodzaj naszywki haftowanej: Podkład filcowy; Klej termozgrzewalny / naprasowanka; Rzep (haczyki); Rzep (pętelki); Brak podkładu (surowy); Podkład papierowy (wydzierany); Klej samoprzylepny; Zapięcie na agrafkę; Podkład plastikowy / PVC; Inne
sv: Typ av baksida för broderad lapp: Filtbaksida; Värmeförsegling/stryklapp; Kardborre (kroksida); Kardborre (öglsida); Ingen baksida (rå); Pappersbaksida (avrivningsbar); Självhäftande baksida; Nålbaksida; Plast-/PVC-baksida; Övrigt
fi: Kirjailumerkin taustamateriaali: Huopatausta; Kuumasaumautuva/silitettävä liima; Tarranauha (koukkupuoli); Tarranauha (lenkkipuoli); Ei taustaa (raaka); Paperitausta (irtirevittävä); Itsekiinnittyvä tarra; Neulakiinnitys; Muovi-/PVC-tausta; Muu
nb: Brodert lappbaksidetype: Filtbakside; Varmeforsegling/strykelim; Borrelås (krokside); Borrelås (løkkeside); Ingen bakside (rå); Papirbakside (avrivbar); Selvklebende lim; Nålbakside; Plast-/PVC-bakside; Annet
hu: Hímzett folt hátlap típusa: Filc hátlap; Vasalható/hőre tapadó hátlap; Tépőzár (horgos oldal); Tépőzár (hurkos oldal); Nincs hátlap (nyers); Papír hátlap (letéphető); Öntapadós hátlap; Kitűzős hátlap; Műanyag/PVC hátlap; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação do patch bordado: Verso em feltro; Termocolante; Fita de contato (lado gancho); Fita de contato (lado argola); Sem verso (cru); Verso de papel (destacável); Adesivo autocolante; Verso com pino; Verso em plástico/PVC; Outro
lt-LT: Siuvinėtos emblemos pagrindo tipas: Veltinio pagrindas; Prilyginami klijai; Kibioji juosta (kabiukų pusė); Kibioji juosta (kilpučių pusė); Be pagrindo (neapdorota); Popierinis pagrindas (nuplėšiamas); Lipnus pagrindas (nulupamas); Segtukas; Plastikinis / PVC pagrindas; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte para patch bordado: Suporte de feltro; Adesivo termosselado/para engomar; Fecho aderente (lado do gancho); Fecho aderente (lado da argola); Sem suporte (cru); Suporte de papel (destacável); Adesivo para descolar e colar; Alfinete na parte traseira; Suporte de plástico/PVC; Outro
ja: 刺繍パッチ裏地タイプ: フェルト裏地; 熱接着/アイロン接着; 面ファスナー (フック側); 面ファスナー (ループ側); 裏地なし; 紙裏地 (ティアアウェイ); 粘着シール; ピンバック; プラスチック/PVC裏地; その他
el: Τύπος υποστρώματος κεντήματος: Υπόστρωμα από τσόχα; Κόλλα θερμοκόλλησης/για σιδέρωμα; Χριτς-χρατς (πλευρά με γαντζάκια); Χριτς-χρατς (πλευρά με θηλιές); Χωρίς υπόστρωμα (ακατέργαστο); Υπόστρωμα χαρτιού (αποσπώμενο); Αυτοκόλλητο (peel-and-stick); Με καρφίτσα; Υπόστρωμα από πλαστικό/PVC; Άλλο
zh-CN: 刺绣贴片背面类型: 毛毡背衬; 热封/熨烫背胶; 魔术贴（勾面）; 魔术贴（毛面）; 无背衬（原样）; 纸质背衬（可撕）; 剥离即贴背胶; 别针背衬; 塑料/PVC 背衬; 其他
th: ประเภทแผ่นรองปัก: แผ่นรองหลังแบบผ้าสักหลาด; กาวแบบรีดติดด้วยความร้อน; ตีนตุ๊กแก (ด้านตะขอ); ตีนตุ๊กแก (ด้านห่วง); ไม่มีแผ่นรองหลัง (ดิบ); แผ่นรองหลังแบบกระดาษ (ฉีกออกได้); กาวแบบลอกแล้วแปะ; เข็มกลัด; แผ่นรองหลังพลาสติก/PVC; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 刺繡貼片背襯類型: 毛氈背襯; 熱封/熨燙黏合劑; 魔鬼氈 (鉤面); 魔鬼氈 (毛面); 無背襯 (原始); 紙背襯 (可撕式); 自黏膠; 別針背襯; 塑膠/PVC 背襯; 其他
bg-BG: Тип основа (гръб) на бродираната нашивка: Филцов гръб; Термично залепване/с ютия; Велкро (страна с кукички); Велкро (страна с примки); Без гръб (суров); Хартиен гръб (откъсващ се); Самозалепващ; Гръб с безопасна игла; Гръб от пластмаса/PVC; Други
ko: 자수 패치 뒷면 유형: 펠트 뒷면; 열접착/다리미 부착형 접착제; 후크 앤 루프(훅 면); 후크 앤 루프(루프 면); 뒷면 없음(기본); 종이 뒷면(찢어내는 타입); 스티커형 접착제; 핀 백; 플라스틱/PVC 뒷면; 기타
sk-SK: Typ podkladovej vrstvy vyšívanej nášivky: Plstený podklad; Tepelne uzatvárateľné/nažehľovacie lepidlo; Suchý zips (strana s háčikmi); Suchý zips (strana so slučkami); Bez podkladu (surové); Papierový podklad (odtrhávací); Samolepiaci podklad; Zapínanie na špendlík; Plastový/PVC podklad; Iné
it: Tipo di supporto per toppa ricamata: Retro in feltro; Adesivo termosaldabile/termoadesivo; Chiusura a strappo (lato uncini); Chiusura a strappo (lato asole); Nessun retro (grezzo); Retro in carta (a strappo); Adesivo peel-and-stick; Retro con spilla; Retro in plastica/PVC; Altro